Rhode Island statutes. Title 34 Property
Chapter 18.1 Commercial Leasing and Other Estates

34-18.1-1.
Purpose.

This chapter shall apply to all commercial properties and other estates, excluding residential properties governed by the Residential Landlord and Tenant Act, chapter 18 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 8; P.L. 1989, ch. 287, § 1.

34-18.1-2.
Quitting by tenants at will or by sufferance on notice.

Tenants of lands or tenements at will or by sufferance covered by this chapter shall quit upon notice in writing from the landlord at the day named therein.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 8; P.L. 1989, ch. 287, § 2.

34-18.1-3.
Liability of tenants by sufferance for rent.

Persons in possession of lands or tenements covered by this chapter as tenants by sufferance shall be liable to pay rent for such time as they may occupy or detain the same.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 8; P.L. 1989, ch. 287, § 3.

34-18.1-4.
Quitting by tenants by parol from year to year.

Tenants by parol of lands, buildings, or parts of buildings covered by this chapter, from year to year, shall quit at the end of the year upon notice in writing from the landlord given at least three (3) months prior to the expiration of the occupation year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 8; P.L. 1989, ch. 287, § 4.

34-18.1-5.
Quitting by tenants by parol for less than one year.

Tenants by parol of lands, buildings, or parts of buildings covered by this chapter, for any term less than a year, shall quit at the end of the term upon notice in writing from the landlord, given at least half the period of the term, but not exceeding three (3) months, prior to the expiration of the term.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 8; P.L. 1989, ch. 287, § 5.

34-18.1-6.
Notice of termination by tenant.

To terminate leases at will or by sufferance or by parol covered by this chapter, like notice shall be given by the tenant, if he or she would quit of the same, as is prescribed to be given by the landlord. The notice shall have the same effect, for all purposes, as if given by the landlord to the tenant.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 8; P.L. 1989, ch. 287, § 6.

34-18.1-7.
Time of termination of letting.

The time agreed upon in a definite letting covered by this chapter shall be the time of the termination thereof for all purposes; and if no time of termination has been agreed upon, it shall be deemed a letting from award year; provided, however, that in any case of a letting at a certain rate per month without any reference as to time, the letting shall be deemed a letting from month to month; and provided, further, that in any case of a letting at a certain rate per week without any other reference as to time, the letting shall be deemed a letting from week to week.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 8; P.L. 1989, ch. 287, § 7.

34-18.1-8.
Surrender of premises damaged by fire or storm — Adjustment of rent.

Where any leased or occupied tenement or other building covered by this chapter is destroyed by fire, hurricane or other cause, or is condemned by any state or municipal authority as unfit for occupancy, the lessee or occupant may, if the destruction or damage occurred without his or her fault or neglect, quit and surrender possession of the leasehold premises and of the land so leased or occupied upon giving written notice to the lessor or owner of his or her intention to quit; and he or she is not liable to pay to the lessor or owner rent for the time subsequent to the surrender of the premises. Any rent paid in advance or which may have accrued by the terms of the lease or any other hiring shall be adjusted to the date of the surrender of the leasehold premises.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 8; P.L. 1989, ch. 287, § 8.

34-18.1-9.
Delinquency in rent — Repossession by ejectment — Judgment.

All suits for possession of lands, buildings or parts of buildings covered by this chapter shall be by the ordinary process of actions for possession or otherwise as provided by law.

If, in any case of a letting covered by this chapter, whether by writing or parol, the stipulated rent, or any part of the same, be due and in arrear for a period of fifteen (15) days, whether demanded or not, the landlord or reversioner wishing to repossess him or herself of the lands, building or parts of buildings let, or recover possession of the same from the tenant, or any person holding under him or her, shall, without the necessity of notice, institute a trespass and action for possession in the district court where the premises are situated, and in this action the court may award a plaintiff judgment for possession and for all rent due plus costs.

For cause shown the justice of the district court may issue a special order providing for the method of service of process upon the defendant.

Answer to the summons and complaint shall be made within seven (7) days of the service upon the defendant. The action shall be heard on the next court day following the seven (7) day period, and shall take precedence on the calendar. If no answer is filed within the time prescribed, judgment shall enter forthwith.

Any aggrieved party may appeal to the superior court from a judgment of the district court by claiming such appeal in writing filed with the clerk within forty-eight (48) hours, exclusive of Sundays and legal holidays, after the judgment is entered.

All such court actions shall have precedence on the calendar and shall continue to have precedence on the calendar on a day-to-day basis until the matter is heard.

Executions shall be issued only to the division of sheriffs or constable of the county where the premises are situated and he or she shall execute the mandates therein contained within twenty (20) days of its issuance. If the member of the division of sheriffs or constable fails to execute the mandates within the prescribed time, the member of the division of sheriffs or constable shall appear before a justice of the court issuing the execution at the regular session of the court next following the twenty (20) days to show cause why the mandates of the execution have not been carried out.

All costs, including reasonable moving costs incurred by the member of the division of sheriffs or constable in carrying out the mandates of the execution may be added to the execution by the clerk upon approval of the court upon presentment of evidence of the costs.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 8; P.L. 1988, ch. 494, § 3; P.L. 1989, ch. 287, § 9; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 66.

34-18.1-10.
Liability of person in possession for rent on land held.

Every person in possession of land covered by this chapter out of which rent is due shall be liable for the just amount or proportion of the rent due from the land in his or her possession, although it is only a part of what was originally demised.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 8; P.L. 1989, ch. 287, § 10.

34-18.1-11.
Action by or against executors or administrators for arrears of rent.

An action may be brought by or against executors and administrators, for any arrears of rent accrued in the lifetime of the deceased parties respectively, in the same manner as for debts due from or to the same parties in their lifetime on a personal contract.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 8.

34-18.1-12.
Other legal remedies for recovery of rents preserved.

Nothing contained in §§

34-18.1-9

—

34-18.1-11

shall deprive landlords of any other legal remedy for the recovery of their rents, whether secured to them by lease or by provision of law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 8.

34-18.1-13.
Apportionment of rent on termination of lease.

When lands covered by this chapter are held by lease of a person who has an estate therein determinable on a life or on a contingency, and such estate determines before the end of a period for which rent is payable, or when an estate, created by a written lease or by operation of the provisions of this chapter, is determined before the end of such a period by surrender, either expressed or by operation of law, by notice to quit, or for nonpayment of rent, or by the death of any party, the landlord, or his or her executors and administrators, may recover a proportional part of such rent according to the time expired, at such determination, of the last period for which such rent was growing due.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 8; P.L. 1989, ch. 287, § 11.

34-18.1-14.
Recovery of prepaid rent on termination of tenancy.

Upon the termination of a tenancy covered by this chapter in any manner mentioned in §

34-18.1-13

before the end of the period for which rent is payable, if the rent for the period has been paid, the portion of the period then unexpired may be recovered back; however, the termination shall not have occurred by reason of any default of the person claiming to recover the rent.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 8; P.L. 1989, ch. 287, § 12.

34-18.1-15.
Right of “self help” prohibited.

The right of a landlord or a reversioner to utilize “self help”, whether pursuant to the common law or pursuant to any agreement in writing or by parol, to reenter and repossess him or herself of land, buildings or parts of buildings leased covered by this chapter upon nonpayment of rent, is prohibited.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 200, § 8; P.L. 1989, ch. 287, § 13.

34-18.1-16.
Payment of rent on stay of execution.

Whenever the issuance of an execution for the recovery of real property covered by this chapter, or the service of an execution, is stayed by order of the court or by the operation of law, the stay shall be conditioned upon the payment, by the defendant or defendants to the plaintiff or plaintiffs in such actions, of sums of money equal to the rent for the premises, which sums shall be paid at the times and in the amounts as rent would be due and payable were the action not then pending. The acceptance of moneys shall not constitute a waiver of the right of the plaintiff or plaintiffs to obtain possession of the premises, nor shall the receipt thereof be deemed to reinstate the defendant or defendants as a tenant.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 494, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 287, § 14.

34-18.1-17.
Issuance of execution on nonpayment of rent.

In the event that the defendant or defendants shall fail or refuse to pay all sums promptly when due, in accordance with the provisions of §

34-18.1-16

, the court in which the judgment for possession was issued shall, on motion of the plaintiff or plaintiffs, and hearing thereon, including satisfactory proof of the nonpayment, enter an order for the issuance of execution and the prompt service thereof, and from that order there shall be no appeal.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 494, § 1.

34-18.1-18.
Payment of rent during pendency of appeal.

Whenever an action for the recovery of real property covered by this chapter shall be pending on appeal in the superior or supreme court, the defendant or defendants in the action shall pay to the plaintiff or plaintiffs sums of money equal to the rent for the premises, which sums shall be paid at such times and in such amounts as rent would be due and payable were the action then not pending. The acceptance of this money shall not constitute a waiver of the right of the plaintiff or plaintiffs to obtain possession of the premises, nor shall the receipt thereof be deemed to reinstate the defendant or defendants as tenants.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 494, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 287, § 15.

34-18.1-19.
Order of judgment on nonpayment of rent in pending appeals.

In the event that the defendant or defendants shall fail or refuse to pay all sums promptly when due, in accordance with the provisions of §

34-18.1-18

, the court in which the case is pending, shall, without any trial on the merits, on motion of the plaintiff or plaintiffs, and hearing thereon, including satisfactory proof of the nonpayment, enter an order for the entry of judgment and the issuance of execution and the prompt service thereof, and from that order there shall be no appeal. The papers shall be forthwith returned to the district court which shall, upon payment of the required fee, issue an execution without further delay.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 494, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 75, § 2.

34-18.1-20.
Removal of persons in tourist camps.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

34-18-8(4)

, all persons keeping tourist camps as defined under §

44-18-7(11)

, including campgrounds, may remove or cause to be removed from such establishment any guest remaining in a rental unit in violation of an agreed upon departure time and date by notifying such guest that the establishment no longer desires to entertain him or her and requesting that he or she immediately leave. Any guest who remains or attempts to remain in a rental unit after being so requested to leave shall be guilty of a civil violation of this section. Any law enforcement officer of this state, upon the request of the operator of the same, shall assist in the abatement of the violation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 507, § 1.